Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1631.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8105. Bankruptcy exemption.In any bankruptcy proceeding filed in this Commonwealth under 11 U.S.C. (relating to bankruptcy), an individual or married couple filing jointly may choose the Federal exemptions contained in 11 U.S.C. § 522(d) (relating to exemptions) or the following:(1) Up to $650,000 in aggregate equity of a primary residence. The amount under this paragraph shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area as of the effective date of this 123456789101112131415161718 paragraph.(2) Personal property not exempted under paragraph (3), a total value of $50,000 for individual filers and $100,000 for married couples filing jointly, plus the aggregate of any prior year's expenses for nondischargeable debts, utilities bills and phone and Internet service payments. The base amounts under this paragraph shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area as of the effective date of this paragraph.(3) The following are exempt in total:(i) All property exempt from judgment under section 8124 (relating to exemption of particular property).(ii) Health aids, including wheelchairs, canes, hearing aids or other medically necessary items.(iii) Current wages.(iv) Alimony, support and maintenance subject to 23 Pa.C.S. (relating to domestic relations).(v) Up to two burial plots, as defined in 9 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions).(vi) Social Security benefits.(vii) College savings plans.(viii) Unemployment benefits arising under the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law.(ix) Workers' compensation arising under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.(x) Medical assistance, as defined in section 1401 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the 20250HB1631PN1981 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Human Services Code.(xi) All benefits arising under a Federal program, including, but not limited to, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Women Infants and Children, Children's Health Insurance Program, Section 8 housing vouchers, Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, Weatherization Assistance Program and Federal Student Aid, including grants, loans and work-study programs.(xii) Tax refunds.(xiii) Court-ordered restitution payments.(xiv) Benefits arising under the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act.(xv) Benefits arising under 38 U.S.C. (relating to veterans' benefits), or excluded by 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 99 (relating to veterans' benefit payment exclusion).(xvi) Awards for the loss of future earnings, recovery for wrongful deaths or compensation received as the result of a civil remedy.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1631PN1981 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021